Hawaii statutes.
[§338-17.8] Certificates for children born
out of State. (a) Upon application of an adult or the legal parents of a
minor child, the director of health shall issue a birth certificate for such
adult or minor, provided that proof has been submitted to the director of
health that the legal parents of such individual while living without the
Territory or State of Hawaii had declared the Territory or State of Hawaii as
their legal residence for at least one year immediately preceding the birth or
adoption of such child.

(b) Proof of legal residency shall be
submitted to the director of health in any manner that the director shall deem
appropriate. The director of health may also adopt any rules pursuant to
chapter 91 that he or she may deem necessary or proper to prevent fraudulent
applications for birth certificates and to require any further information or
proof of events necessary for completion of a birth certificate.

(c) The fee for each application for
registration shall be established by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 91. [L
1982, c 182, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next